Arkansas, session 2025, SB402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 13, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-13-114. Employee organization and professional association — Certain
restrictions required.
A public school district and an educational service cooperative shall
not:
(1) Require or coerce an individual employed by the public
school district or educational service cooperative to meet, communicate,
listen to, or otherwise interact with an employee organization or a
professional association;
(2) Distribute membership solicitations on behalf of an employee
organization or a professional association; or
*TNL182*
03-18-2025 14:03:55 TNL182

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB402
(3) Permit an employee organization, a professional association,
or a corporation or foreign corporation access to or use of the public school
district's or educational service cooperative's meetings, events, facilities,
communication systems, computer systems, equipment, supplies, or other
resources on terms more favorable than those terms extended to any other
employee organization, professional association, or corporation or foreign
corporation that requests access to or use of the public school district's or
educational service cooperative's meetings, events, facilities, communication
systems, computer systems, equipment, supplies, or other resources.

/s/C. Penzo

























03-18-2025 14:03:55 TNL182